Louisiana, session 2026, HB705.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:4 (A) and (B) and 5 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§4. Contempt of the legislature; penalties
A. Whenever the legislature or either house of the legislature, or whenever
any committee of either house or any joint committee of both houses or any sub-
committee subcommittee of any such committee, which committee, joint committee
or sub-committee subcommittee has been specifically and expressly granted the
subpoena power, has summoned any person as a witness to give testimony or to
produce papers or other evidence upon any matter under inquiry before such house,
committee, joint committee or sub-committee subcommittee, such person shall be
guilty of contempt of the legislature if he or she does any of the following:
(1) willfully Willfully defaults by failing to appear or to produce papers or
other evidence, as ordered, or.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-805 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 705
(2) having Having appeared, refuses to take the oath or affirmation of a
witness, or.
(3) having Having appeared, refuses to answer any question pertinent to the
question under inquiry.
B. Whoever is found guilty of contempt of the legislature under the
provisions of this section Section shall be punished as follows:
(1) For a first offense, by a fine of not more than one thousand five hundred
dollars.
(2) For a second offense, by a fine of not more than two thousand five
hundred dollars.
(3) For a third and subsequent offenses, by a fine of not more than five
thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or both.
* * *
§5. Certification of facts of contempt; prosecution; arrest
Whenever a statement of facts alleged to constitute contempt under R.S. 24:4
is reported to either house of the legislature while the legislature is in session, or
whenever, while the legislature is not in session, such statement is reported to and
filed with the president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives,
said the president or speaker, as the case may be, shall do the following:
(1) Certify certify the statement to the district attorney of a district where
venue lies, as provided in the general laws governing venue or as provided by R.S.
24:6 in the case of offenses defined in R.S. 24:4(A), and the district attorney shall
institute and prosecute a criminal proceeding against the accused for contempt of the
legislature under the provisions of R.S. 24:4.
(2) Certify the statement to the appropriate law enforcement officer, who
shall immediately arrest the accused for contempt of the legislature under the
provisions of R.S. 24:4.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-805 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 705